California statutes. Education Code
Each district board shall provide for substantial teacher involvement in the selection of instructional materials and shall promote the involvement of parents and other members of the community in the selection of instructional materials.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 413, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

60005.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that it is in the public interest for the State Board of Education to adopt policies and procedures concerning the development of curriculum frameworks and the adoption of instructional materials only after public notice, comment by the public, and review by the Office of Administrative Law and for these policies and procedures to be published in the California Code of Regulations. Therefore, the Legislature reaffirms that the policies and procedures concerning the development of curriculum frameworks and the adoption of instructional materials shall be adopted pursuant to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. These policies and procedures include, but are not limited to, the following:

(1) Board policies that define statutory terms.

(2) Board policies that prescribe the membership of committees used in the development and adoption process.

(3) Procedures that regulate public participation in the development of curriculum frameworks and the adoption of instructional materials.

(b) The board shall adopt as regulations the policies and procedures concerning the development of curriculum frameworks and the adoption of instructional materials.

(c) (1) The following shall not be subject to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code:

(A) The content of curriculum frameworks.

(B) Evaluation criteria and worksheets developed to supplement curriculum frameworks.

(2) The board shall adopt the content of curriculum frameworks and evaluation criteria and worksheets developed to supplement curriculum frameworks in accordance with the regulations established pursuant to subdivision (b) of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 707, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.   Operative January 1, 1995, by Sec. 2 of Ch. 707.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Definitions [60010. - 60010.]

60010.

For purposes of this part, the following terms have the following meanings unless the context in which they appear clearly requires otherwise:

(a) “Basic instructional materials” means instructional materials that are designed for use by pupils as a principal learning resource and that meet in organization and content the basic requirements of the intended course.

(b) “Commission” means the Instructional Quality Commission.

(c) “Curriculum framework” means an outline of the components of a given course of study designed to provide state direction to school districts in the provision of instructional programs.

(d) “District board” means the board of education or governing board of a county, city and county, city, or other district that has the duty to provide for the education of the children in its county, city and county, city, or district.

(e) “Elementary school” means all public schools in which instruction is given through grade 8 or in any one or more of those grades.

(f) “Governing boards” means the state board and any one or more district boards.

(g) “High school” means all public schools other than elementary schools in which instruction is given through grade 12, or in any one or more of those grades.

(h) “Instructional materials” means all materials that are designed for use by pupils and their teachers as a learning resource and help
 pupils to acquire facts, skills, or opinions or to develop cognitive processes. Instructional materials may be printed or nonprinted, and may include textbooks, technology-based materials, other educational materials, and tests.

(i) “Nonpublic school” means a school that both satisfies the requirements of Section 48222, and is exempt from taxation under Section 214 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(j) “School official” means a member of a governing board, a city, county, city and county, or district superintendent of schools, and a principal, teacher, or other employee under their charge.

(k) “State board” means the State Board of Education.

(l) “Supplementary instructional materials” means instructional materials designed to serve, but not be
 limited to, one or more of the following purposes, for a given subject, at a given grade level:

(1) To provide more complete coverage of a subject or subjects included in a given course.

(2) To provide for meeting the various learning ability levels of pupils in a given age group or grade level.

(3) To provide for meeting the diverse educational needs of pupils with a language disability in a given age group or grade level.

(4) To provide for meeting the diverse educational needs of pupils reflective of a condition of cultural pluralism.

(5) To use current, relevant technology that further engages interactive learning in the classroom and beyond.

(m) (1) “Technology-based materials” means basic or supplemental instructional materials that are designed for use by pupils and teachers as learning resources and that require the availability of electronic equipment in order to be used as a learning resource. Technology-based materials include, but are not limited to, software programs, video disks, compact disks, optical disks, video and audiotapes, lesson plans, and databases.

(2) Technology-based materials also includes the electronic equipment required to make use of those materials used by pupils and teachers as a learning resource, including, but not limited to, laptop computers and devices that provide internet access.

(3) This subdivision does not relieve a school district of the obligation to provide pupils with sufficient textbooks or
 instructional materials pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 60119. If a county office of education determines that a school district is out of compliance with paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 60119, that school district is not authorized to procure electronic equipment pursuant to paragraph (2) of this subdivision.

(n) “Test” means a device used to measure the knowledge or achievement of pupils.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 110, Sec. 27.   (SB 820)   Effective September 18, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Requirements, Materials [60040. - 60052.]

60040.

When adopting instructional materials for use in the schools, governing boards shall include only instructional materials that, in their determination, accurately portray the cultural and racial diversity of our society, including:

(a) The contributions of people of all genders in all types of roles, including professional, vocational, and executive roles.

(b) The role and contributions of Native Americans, African Americans, Latino Americans, Asian Americans, Pacific Islanders, European Americans, LGBTQ+ Americans, persons with disabilities, and members of other ethnic,
 cultural, religious, and socioeconomic status groups to the total development of California and the United States.

(c) The role and contributions of the entrepreneur and labor in the total development of California and the United States.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 229, Sec. 9.   (AB 1078)   Effective September 25, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

60040.5.

No later than July 1, 2025, the department shall issue guidance related to how to help school districts, county offices of education, charter schools, and school personnel manage conversations about race, ethnicity, nationality, and gender, and how to review instructional materials to ensure that they represent diverse perspectives and are culturally relevant.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 38, Sec. 82.   (SB 153)   Effective June 29, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

60041.

When adopting instructional materials for use in the schools, governing boards shall include only instructional materials that accurately portray both of the following, whenever appropriate:

(a) Humanity’s place in ecological systems and the necessity for the protection of our environment.

(b) The effects on the human system of the use of tobacco, alcohol, and narcotics and restricted dangerous drugs, as defined in Section 11032 of the
 Health and Safety Code, and other dangerous substances.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 581, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

60042.

When adopting instructional materials for use in the schools, governing boards shall require such materials as they deem necessary and proper to encourage thrift, fire prevention and the humane treatment of animals and people.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

60043.

When adopting instructional materials for use in the schools, the governing board shall require, when appropriate to the comprehension of pupils, that textbooks for social science, history or civics classes contain the Declaration of Independence and the Constitution of the United States.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1011.)
-------------------------------------------

60044.

A governing board shall not adopt any instructional materials for use in the schools that, in its determination, contain:

(a) Any matter reflecting adversely upon persons on the basis of race or ethnicity, gender, religion, disability, nationality, or sexual orientation, occupation, or because of a characteristic listed in Section 220.

(b) Any sectarian or denominational doctrine or propaganda contrary to law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 162, Sec. 38.   (SB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

60045.

(a) All instructional materials adopted by any governing board for use in the schools shall be, to the satisfaction of the governing board, accurate, objective, and current and suited to the needs and comprehension of pupils at their respective grade levels.

(b) With the exception of literature and tradebooks, all instructional materials adopted by any governing board for use in schools shall use proper grammar and spelling. The state board may adopt regulations that provide for
 other allowable exceptions to this subdivision for educational purposes, as determined by the state board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 276, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

60046.

Any governing board may conduct an investigation of the compliance of any instructional materials which it adopts with the requirements of this article.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

60047.

In the event that after the good faith acquisition of instructional materials by a governing board, the instructional materials are found to be in violation of this article and the governing board is unable to acquire other instructional materials which meet the requirements of this article in time for them to be used when the acquired materials were planned to be used, the governing board may use the acquired materials but only for that academic year.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

60048.

(a) Basic instructional materials, and other instructional materials required to be legally and socially compliant pursuant to Sections 60040 to 60047, inclusive, including illustrations, that provide any exposure to a commercial brand name, product, or corporate or company logo in a manner that is inconsistent with guidelines or frameworks adopted by the State Board of Education may not be adopted by a school district governing board.

(b) The governing board of a school district
 may not adopt basic instructional materials, and other instructional materials required to be legally and socially compliant pursuant to Sections 60040 to 60047, inclusive, including illustrations, that contain a commercial brand name, product, or corporate or company logo unless the governing board makes a specific finding pursuant to the criteria set forth in paragraph (5) of subdivision (c) of Section 60200 that the use of the commercial brand name, product, or corporate or company logo in the instructional materials is appropriate.

(c) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit the publisher of instructional materials to include whatever corporate name or logo on the instructional materials that is necessary to provide basic information about the publisher, to protect its copyright, or to identify third party sources of content.

(d) The state board may adopt
 regulations that provide for other allowable exceptions to this section, as determined by the state board.

(e) The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall develop, and the State Board of Education shall adopt, guidelines to implement this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 276, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

60052.

When adopting instructional materials for use in schools, the governing board of a school district may include relevant technology-based materials, as defined in subdivision (m) of Section 60010, if the materials are both available and comparable to other, equivalent instructional materials, as defined in subdivision (h) of Section 60010.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 269, Sec. 2.   (AB 2694)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Requirements, Publishers and Manufacturers [60060. - 60063.5.]

60060.

Every publisher or manufacturer of instructional materials offered for adoption or sale in California shall comply with all the requirements and provisions of this part.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

60061.

(a) A publisher or manufacturer shall do all of the following:

(1) Furnish the instructional materials offered by the publisher at a price in this state that, including all costs of transportation to that place, does not exceed the lowest price at which the publisher offers those same instructional materials for adoption or sale to any other state within, or
 territory of,
 the United States.

(2) Automatically reduce the price of those instructional materials to any governing board to the extent that reductions are made in another state within, or territory of, the United States.

(3) Provide any instructional materials free of charge in this state to the same extent as that received by any state or school district in the United States.

(4) Guarantee that all copies of any instructional materials sold in this state are at least equal in quality to the copies of
 those instructional materials that are sold elsewhere in the United States, and are kept revised, free from all errors, and up to date as may be required by the state board.

(5) Not in any way, directly or indirectly, become associated or connected with any combination in restraint of trade in instructional materials, or enter into any understanding, agreement, or combination to control prices or restrict competition in the sale of instructional materials for use in this state.

(6) Maintain a representative, office, or depository in the State of California or arrange with an independently owned and operated depository in the State of California to receive and fill orders for instructional materials.

(7) Provide to the state, at no cost, computer files or other electronic versions of each state-adopted literary title
 and the right to transcribe, reproduce, modify, and distribute the material in braille, large print if the publisher does not offer a large print edition, recordings, American Sign Language videos for the deaf, or other specialized accessible media exclusively for use by pupils with visual disabilities or other disabilities that prevent use of standard instructional materials. Computer files or other electronic versions of materials adopted shall be provided within 30 days of request by the state as needed for the purposes described in this subdivision as follows:

(A) Computer files or other electronic versions of literary titles shall maintain the structural integrity of the standard instructional materials, be compatible with commonly used braille translation and speech synthesis software, and include corrections and revisions as may be necessary.

(B) Computer files or other
 electronic versions of nonliterary titles, including science and mathematics, shall be provided when technology is available to convert those materials to a format that maintains the structural integrity of the standard instructional materials and is compatible with braille translation and speech synthesis software.

(b) Upon the willful failure of the publisher or manufacturer to comply with the requirements of this section, the publisher or manufacturer shall be liable to the governing board in the amount of three times the total sum that the publisher or manufacturer was paid in excess of the price required under paragraphs (1), (2), and (5) of subdivision (a), and in the amount of three times the total value of the instructional materials and services that the governing board is entitled to receive free of charge under subdivision (a).

(c) Nothing in this section shall be construed to restrict the ability of a school district, county office of education, or charter school within California to negotiate the price of standards-aligned instructional materials and supplemental instructional materials in either a printed or digital format if the negotiated price complies with paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 174, Sec. 1.   (SB 185)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

60061.5.

A publisher or manufacturer shall do all of the following:

(a) Actively solicit or make available a process through which input concerning the quality, content, and usability of textbooks and instructional materials can be obtained from educators, parents, teachers, and students.

Upon request of a district governing board a publisher shall provide a summation of that information including both positive and critical input and their responses to the positive and critical input.

(b) Guarantee delivery of textbooks and instructional materials prior to the opening of school in the year in which the textbooks and instructional materials are to be used if they are ordered by a date or dates specified in the contract with the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1482, Sec. 1.   Effective September 30, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

60061.8.

(a) Basic instructional materials, as defined by Section 60010, offered on or after January 1, 2005, shall comply with all of the following:

(1) Print materials shall have sharp, clear, high contrast, and highly legible fonts. Print materials designed for kindergarten shall use fonts that are at least 20 point. Print materials designed for grade 1 shall use fonts that are at least 18 point. Print materials designed for grade 2 shall use fonts that are at least 16 point.

(2) Video products designed for pupils in kindergarten and grades 1 to 12, inclusive, shall be closed-captioned, as defined by the Federal Communications Commission, except for the following:

(A) Video products or portions of video products, if any, for which the publisher does not have the rights to close-caption.

(B) Video products or portions of video products that are open-captioned, meaning that all viewers see the captioned information.

(3) (A) Internet resources and digital multimedia programs intended for use by the general population of pupils, for pupils in kindergarten and grades 1 to 12, inclusive, shall at least meet the standards for accessibility, as set forth in Section 508 of the Rehabilitation Act of 1973, as amended (29 U.S.C. Sec. 794d), and regulations implementing that act as set forth in Part 1194 of Title 36 of the Code of Federal Regulations, unless meeting those standards would do any of the following:

(i) Fundamentally alter the nature of the instructional activity.

(ii) Result in those resources or programs placing an undue financial and administrative burden on the state agencies, school districts, or schools that would likely access or utilize the resources or programs, as determined by the affected agencies in collaboration with the publishers.

(iii) Cause those resources or programs to fail to meet standards otherwise required by statute or regulation.

(B) In order to facilitate access by pupils with disabilities who are progressing in the general curriculum, to the extent technologically feasible, a digital multimedia program shall allow the user to control sizing of images and fonts, speed and volume of audio, colors or contrast, or both colors and contrast, and other inherently transformable attributes, but not for modification of content, to match individual performance and abilities. If a publisher is not able to create a multimedia program that satisfies the requirements of this subparagraph, the publisher shall provide the State Department of Education, upon request, with computer files or other electronic versions of textual content of basic instructional materials compatible with braille transcription, meeting department specifications at no additional cost, and as a condition of sale.

(b) This section does not apply to basic instructional materials adopted, prior to January 1, 2005, by the state board pursuant to Section 60200, to the extent those instructional materials do not already comply with this section. A publisher of basic instructional materials adopted before January 1, 2005, may voluntarily modify those materials as may be necessary to comply with this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 183, Sec. 78.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

60062.

The provisions of Section 60061 shall apply to the purchase of instructional materials under Sections 18132 and 18171.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

60063.

(a) A publisher or manufacturer that submits a printed instructional material for adoption by the state board pursuant to Section 60200 or the governing board of a school district pursuant to Section 60400, or for use by the governing board of a school district pursuant to Section 60210, on or after January 1, 2014, shall ensure that the printed instructional material is also available in an equivalent digital format during the entire term of the adoption.

(b) The equivalent digital format of a printed instructional material shall conform to the most current, ratified standards under Section 508 of the federal Rehabilitation Act of 1973 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 794d), as amended, and the Web Content Accessibility Guidelines adopted by the World Wide Web Consortium for accessibility.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 157, Sec. 1.   (AB 133)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

60063.5.

(a) Instructional materials or supplemental instructional materials that are consistent with the requirements of Section 60119 shall be offered by a publisher or manufacturer as unbundled elements to enable digital materials or printed materials to be purchased separately from other components.

(b) Without violating any copyright law or contract between a school district and a publisher or manufacturer, a school district may use instructional materials in digital format that were purchased by the school district to create a districtwide online digital database for classroom use consistent with an online security system
 that is mutually agreed on by the publisher and the school district.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 174, Sec. 2.   (SB 185)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Prohibited Acts [60070. - 60076.]

60070.

No school official shall require any pupil, except pupils in classes for adults to purchase any instructional material for the pupils’ use in the school.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

60071.

No publisher or manufacturer of instructional materials, nor any of his representatives, shall offer or give any emolument, money, or other valuable thing, or any inducement, to any school official to directly or indirectly introduce, recommend, vote for, or otherwise influence the adoption or purchase of any instructional material.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

60072.

No school official shall accept any emolument, money or other valuable thing, or any inducement to directly or indirectly introduce, recommend, vote for, or otherwise influence the adoption or purchase of any instructional material.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

60073.

Any publisher or manufacturer of instructional materials or his representative, or any school official who violates any of the provisions of this article is guilty of a misdemeanor. Any school official who violates any of the provisions of this article shall, in addition to any other penalty, be removed from his official position.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

60074.

Nothing in this article shall be construed to prevent any publisher, manufacturer, or agent from supplying for purposes of examination necessary sample copies of instructional materials to any school official.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

60075.

Nothing in this article shall be construed to prevent a school official from receiving sample copies of instructional materials.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

60076.

Nothing contained in this article shall be construed to prohibit or restrict a school official from receiving royalties or other compensation from the publisher or manufacturer of instructional materials written, designed, or prepared by such school official, and adopted or purchased by any governing board, other than compensation paid as commission to the school official for negotiating sales to governing boards. No district shall have or claim the right to receive any such royalty or other compensation due to any school official employed by the district unless the instructional material was written or prepared during the normal schoolday during which the school official is required by the district to be on duty.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Reports [60090. - 60090.]

60090.

Each district board shall make reports, whenever required, directly to the Superintendent of Public Instruction, concerning the instructional materials used in its schools.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Instructional Materials on Alcohol and Drug Education [60110. - 60115.]

60110.

It is the intent of the Legislature that the State Board of Education give high priority to the adoption of instructional materials on alcohol, drug, and traffic safety education for classroom use by teachers and pupils. The materials shall be designed to assist the teacher in presenting instruction on alcohol, drug, and traffic safety education and to meet the needs of pupils at their respective grade levels. The materials shall be accurate, objective, and current.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1492, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

60111.

The Department of Education shall establish an information center of current alcohol, drug, and traffic safety education materials which may be used by school districts and teachers for instruction on alcohol, drug, and traffic safety education. The information center shall include, but not be limited to, all the following: current state and federal alcohol and drug laws, including those related to traffic safety; samples of effective courses of study, curriculum guides, teaching materials, and reference materials; and reports of current and school district policies related to alcohol, drug, and traffic safety education.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1492, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

60115.

(a) The State Department of Education shall assemble, coordinate, and make available to the public schools and to private driving schools in this state, upon request, for their use in driver education programs, any relevant programs, materials, and information prepared or compiled by the Governor’s Intergovernmental Advisory Committee on Alcohol, Drugs, and Traffic Safety.

(b) The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall allow to each school district maintaining a high school, county superintendents of schools, and the Department of the Youth Authority an amount not to exceed one dollar ($1) per pupil instructed in driver education during the preceding fiscal year. At least 50 percent of the funds received pursuant to this subdivision shall be used for the purchase of related instructional materials or for related in-service training for teachers, or both. Funds to implement this subdivision shall be provided when appropriated by the Legislature from the Driver Training Penalty Assessment Fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1455, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Public Hearings, Instructional Materials [60119. - 60119.]

60119.

(a) In order to be eligible to receive funds available for purposes of this article, the governing board of a school district shall take the following actions:

(1) (A) The governing board of a school district shall hold a public hearing or hearings at which the governing board shall encourage participation by parents, teachers, members of the community interested in the affairs of the school district, and bargaining unit leaders, and shall make a determination, through a resolution, as to whether each pupil in each school in the school district has sufficient textbooks or instructional materials, or both, that are aligned to the content standards adopted by the state
 board in each of the following subjects, as appropriate, that are consistent with the content and cycles of the curriculum framework adopted by the state board:

(i) Mathematics.

(ii) Science.

(iii) History-social science.

(iv) English language arts, including the English language development component of an adopted program.

(B) The public hearing shall take place on or before the end of the eighth week from the first day pupils attend school for that year. A school district that operates schools on a multitrack, year-round calendar shall hold the hearing on or before the end of the eighth
 week from the first day pupils attend school for that year on any tracks that begin a school year in August or September.

(C) As part of the hearing required pursuant to this section, the governing board of a school district also shall make a written determination as to whether each pupil enrolled in a world language or health course has sufficient textbooks or instructional materials that are consistent with the content and cycles of the curriculum frameworks adopted by the state board for those subjects. The governing board of a school district also shall determine the availability of laboratory science equipment as applicable to science laboratory courses offered in grades 9 to 12, inclusive. The provision of the textbooks, instructional materials, or science equipment specified in this subparagraph is not a condition of receipt of funds
 provided by this subdivision.

(2) (A) If the governing board of a school district determines that there are insufficient textbooks or instructional materials, or both, the governing board shall provide information to classroom teachers and to the public setting forth, in the resolution, for each school in which an insufficiency exists, the percentage of pupils who lack sufficient standards-aligned textbooks or instructional materials in each subject area and the reasons that each pupil does not have sufficient textbooks or instructional materials, or both, and take any action, except an action that would require reimbursement by the Commission on State Mandates, to ensure that each pupil has sufficient textbooks or instructional materials, or both, within two months of the beginning of the school year in which the
 determination is made. The governing board shall submit a copy of the resolution to the county superintendent of schools no later than three business days after the governing board hearing.

(B) In carrying out subparagraph (A), the governing board of a school district may use moneys in any of the following funds:

(i) Any funds available for textbooks or instructional materials, or both, from categorical programs, including any funds allocated to school districts that have been appropriated in the annual Budget Act.

(ii) Any funds of the school district that are in excess of the amount available for each pupil during the prior fiscal year to purchase textbooks or instructional materials, or both.

(iii) Any other funds available to the school district for textbooks or instructional materials, or both.

(b) The governing board of a school district shall provide 10 days’ notice of the public hearing or hearings set forth in subdivision (a). The notice shall contain the time, place, and purpose of the hearing and shall be posted in three public places in the school district. The hearing shall be held at a time that will encourage the attendance of teachers and parents and guardians of pupils who attend the schools in the school district and shall not take place during or immediately following school hours.

(c) (1) For purposes of this section, “sufficient textbooks or instructional materials” means that
 each pupil, including English learners, has a standards-aligned textbook or instructional materials, or both, to use in class and to take home. This paragraph does not require two sets of textbooks or instructional materials for each pupil. The materials may be in a digital format as long as each pupil, at a minimum, has and can access the same materials in the class and to take home, as all other pupils in the same class or course in the school district and has the ability to use and access them at home.

(2) Sufficient textbooks or instructional materials as defined in paragraph (1) do not include photocopied sheets from only a portion of a textbook or instructional materials copied to address a shortage.

(d) The governing board of a school district that receives funds for
 instructional materials from any state source is subject to the requirements of this section.

(e) For the purpose of transitioning to instructional materials that are aligned with the common core academic content standards and science content standards, it is the intent of the Legislature that textbooks, instructional materials, and supplemental instructional materials be deemed to be aligned with the content standards pursuant to subdivisions (a) and (c), and be deemed consistent with the content and cycles of the curriculum framework adopted by the state board pursuant to subdivision (a) if the textbooks, instructional materials, supplemental instructional materials, or a combination of any such materials are aligned to the content standards adopted pursuant to Section 60605 or 60605.8, or former Section 60605.85, as that section read on
 June 30, 2014.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 229, Sec. 11.   (AB 1078)   Effective September 25, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Fiscal Penalty [60150. - 60152.]

60150.

(a) If the Superintendent determines that a school district has not provided sufficient textbooks or instructional materials pursuant to clause (i) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (5) of subdivision (i) of Section 1240 or subdivision (d) of Section 35186, the department shall take all remedial actions described in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (5) of subdivision (i) of Section 1240, including purchasing textbooks and instructional materials.

(b) (1) A school district that the Superintendent determines has not provided sufficient textbooks or instructional materials pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be assessed a financial penalty equal to the amount of funding the school district would have received for the 2012–13 fiscal year for the
 Instructional Materials Block Grant pursuant to Item 6110-189-0001 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2012, prior to the reduction pursuant to Section 12.42 of the Budget Act of 2012, as adjusted annually for cost of living pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 42238.02 for the 2013–14 fiscal year through the fiscal year in which the school district was determined to have failed to provide sufficient textbooks or instructional materials.

(2) The financial penalty applied pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be a reduction to the principal apportionment made to the school district for the applicable fiscal year pursuant to Section 41330, 41332, or 41335, as applicable. However, a reduction pursuant to this subdivision shall not reduce the final apportionment below the amount necessary to meet the requirements of Section 6 of Article IX of the California Constitution, as specified in Section 41975, and Section 36 of Article XIII of
 the California Constitution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 38, Sec. 83.   (SB 153)   Effective June 29, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

60151.

(a) (1) If the Superintendent determines, pursuant to a complaint filed with the Superintendent directly or an appeal of a local educational agency decision regarding a complaint, that a local educational agency violated subdivision (a) of Section 244, the department shall notify the local educational agency that it must take corrective action. If corrective action is not taken within 60 days, the department may use any means authorized by law to effect compliance.

(2) The department, pursuant to the notification made to a local educational agency
 described in paragraph (1), may require specified corrective action be taken by the local educational agency, including, but not limited to, any of the following:

(A) Obtaining technical assistance from the Office of Civil Rights pursuant to Section 33802.

(B) Requiring the local educational agency to engage in regular reporting to the Office of Civil Rights and to use alternative instructional materials.

(C) (i) Require the local educational agency, in consultation with the Office of Civil Rights, to develop and implement an improvement plan to address discrimination and bias at its schoolsites.

(ii) If a violation involves antisemitism, the improvement plan pursuant to clause (i) shall be created in consultation with the
 Antisemitism Prevention Coordinator established pursuant to Section 33803.1.

(3) Notwithstanding Section 60047, if instructional materials are found to violate subdivision (a) of Section 244, those instructional materials shall immediately and permanently be omitted from the all course materials and shall not be used in any current course offerings or any subsequent course offerings.
